Utah statutes.
39-7-107.   Exercise of rights not to affect future financial transactions.
Application by a service member in military service for, or receipt of, a
stay, postponement, or suspension under the provisions of this chapter in the
payment of any fine, penalty, insurance premium, or other civil obligation or
liability may not be used for any of the following:
(1)  a determination by any lender or other person that the service member is
unable to pay any civil obligation or liability in accordance with its terms;
(2)  with respect to a credit transaction between a creditor and a service
member:
(a)  a denial or revocation of credit by the creditor;
(b)  a change by the creditor in the terms of an existing credit arrangement;
or
(c)  a refusal by the creditor to grant credit to the service member in
substantially the amount or on substantially the terms requested; or
(3)  an adverse report relating to the creditworthiness of the service member
by or to any person or entity engaged in the practice of assembling or
evaluating consumer credit information.
